dictsource/mn_rules
        L04L05) у (L09_          U#
        L04L05L05) у (L09_       U#
        L04L05L05L05) у (L09_    U#
        L04L05L05L05L05) у (L09_    U#
        L04L05) у (L09L04        U#
        L04L05L05) у (L09L04     U#
        L04L05L05L05) у (L09L04  U#
        L04L05L05L05L05) у (L09L04  U#
        L04L05) у (_             U#
        L04L05L05) у (_          U#
        L04L05L05L05) у (_       U#
        L04L05L05L05L05) у (_       U#

        у                   U

.group ү
        үүй (+++            y:j
        үү (+++             y:
        үй (+++             yI

        L04L05) ү (L07L04+

        L04L05) ү (L09_          y#
        L04L05L05) ү (L09_       y#
        L04L05L05L05) ү (L09_    y#
        L04L05L05L05L05) ү (L09_    y#
        L04L05) ү (L09L04        y#
        L04L05L05) ү (L09L04     y#
        L04L05L05L05) ү (L09L04  y#
        L04L05L05L05L05) ү (L09L04  y#
        L04L05) ү (_             y#
        L04L05L05) ү (_          y#
        L04L05L05L05) ү (_       y#
        L04L05L05L05L05) ү (_       y#

        ү                   y

// -- Neutral vowels: exempt from deletion (case-suffix vowels) --

.group и
        ий (+++             i:
        ии (+++             i:
        и                   i

.group ы
        ый (+++             i:
        ы                   i


// -- Iotated vowels: я, ё, ю, е ---------------------------------
//
// Mongolian я ё ю always carry their glide, unlike Russian, where
// after a consonant they merely palatalise it. Writing them as j+V
// is also what realises palatalisation on labials and velars, since
// [mʲa] and [mja] are the same percept.
//
// е is the exception: /je/ word-initially and after a vowel or ь,
// but plain /e/ after a consonant (mostly Russian loanwords).

.group я
        яа (+++             ja:
        я                   ja

.group ё
        ёо (+++             jO:
        ё                   jO

.group ю
        юү (+++             jy:
        юу (+++             jU:
        ю                   jU

.group е
        // ъ is the hard sign, and marking this glide is the whole reason it is
        // written. There was a rule for ь but none for ъ, so е fell through to
        // the plain catch-all and объект came out [ɔpekt] with no /j/ at all.
        // ё, ю and я keep theirs only because they emit /j/ unconditionally.
        ъ) е                je
        ь) е                je
        _) еэ               je:
        A) еэ               je:
        еэ                  e:
        _) ее               je:
        _) е                je
        A) е                je
        е                   e


// ============================================================
//  CONSONANTS
//
//  Each consonant that can be palatalised carries two ь rules:
//
//      C (ьL08    <plain>      // ья/ье/ьё/ью/ьи -- the vowel
//                              // supplies the glide, so the
//                              // consonant must NOT add a second
//                              // one (ярья is [jarja])
//      C (ь       <palatal>    // ь at a syllable coda (морь)
// ============================================================

// -- Unaspirated stops: б д г -----------------------------------

.group б
        б (ьL08     p
        б (ь        pj
        б           p

.group д
        д (ьL08     t
        д (ь        t;
        д           t

// г has two surface forms, chosen by the harmony class of the
// WORD rather than by the neighbouring letter alone:
//   k   velar stop  - front-harmony words
//   q   uvular stop - back-harmony words
//
// There used to be a third, Q" (uvular fricative [ʁ]), for the
// intervocalic position: бага was [paʁa]. A native speaker could not
// understand that word, nor байгууллага or сургууль -- the three
// "didn't understand" items that contained a uvular. Offered a choice
// between the fricative, a uvular stop, and no uvular at all, he chose
// the STOP. So the harmony-driven uvular allophone is right and only its
// fricative realisation was wrong: г is a stop in every position.
// The -гт- cluster lenites to a fricative in both classes
// (цагт [tsʰaχt], эгшиг [ekʃik]).
.group г
        // ь + an iotated vowel: palatalised, but the vowel brings its
        // own /j/ so this must NOT add one. Needs the full harmony ladder
        // because the `(ь` rules below outrank a bare `(ьL08` guard and
        // would otherwise double the glide (өгье -> [ɵkjje]).
        L01L10L10L10) г (ьL08	q
        L01L10L10) г (ьL08	q
        L01L10) г (ьL08	q
        L01) г (ьL08	q
        L02L10L10L10) г (ьL08	k
        L02L10L10) г (ьL08	k
        L02L10) г (ьL08	k
        L02) г (ьL08	k

        // Same as х above: .L05 contains ь, so the `L01) г (L05` ladder was
        // eating г before ь and the palatalisation never fired (баг and багь
        // were identical). Harmony still applies through the ь.
        L01L10L10L10) г (ь     qj
        L01L10L10) г (ь     qj
        L01L10) г (ь        qj
        L01) г (ь           qj
        L02L10L10L10) г (ь     kj
        L02L10L10) г (ь     kj
        L02L10) г (ь        kj
        L02) г (ь           kj
        г (ь                kj

        L02L10L10L10) г (т     x
        L02L10L10) г (т     x
        L02L10) г (т        x
        L02) г (т           x
        L01L10L10L10) г (т     X
        L01L10L10) г (т     X
        L01L10) г (т        X
        L01) г (т           X
        г (т                X

        L01) г (L04+        q       // intervocalic, back-harmony word

        L01L10L10L10) г (и     q       // и is transparent to harmony
        L01L10L10) г (и     q       // и is transparent to harmony
        L01L10) г (и        q
        L01) г (и           q       // zero-gap rung: the ladder was missing
        L01L10L10L10) г (й     q
        L01L10L10) г (й     q
        L01L10) г (й        q
        L01) г (й           q
        L02L10L10L10) г (и     k
        L02L10L10) г (и     k
        L02L10) г (и        k
        L02) г (и           k

        г (L01              q
        г (L02              k
        г (и                k

        L01L10L10L10) г (_     q
        L01L10L10) г (_     q
        L01L10) г (_        q
        L01) г (_           q
        L02L10L10L10) г (_     k
        L02L10L10) г (_     k
        L02L10) г (_        k
        L02) г (_           k
        L01L10L10L10) г (L05   q
        L01L10L10) г (L05   q
        L01L10) г (L05      q
        L01) г (L05         q
        L02L10L10L10) г (L05   k
        L02L10L10) г (L05   k
        L02L10) г (L05      k
        L02) г (L05         k

        г                   k


// -- Aspirated stops: п т к -------------------------------------

.group п
        п (ьL08     ph
        п (ь        phj
        п           ph

.group т
        т (ьL08     th
        т (ь        th;
        тт          tth        // geminate: one closure, one aspirated release
        т           th

.group к
        к (ьL08     kh
        к (ь        khj
        к           kh


// -- Affricates: з ц ж ч ----------------------------------------

.group з
        з (ьL08     ts
        з (ь        ts;
        з           ts

.group ц
        ц (ьL08     tsh
        ц (ь        tsh;
        ц           tsh

.group ж
        ж (ьL08     tS
        ж (ь        tS;
        ж           tS

.group ч
        ч (ьL08     tSh
        ч (ь        tShj
        ч           tSh


// -- Fricatives -------------------------------------------------

// х is uvular [χ] in back-harmony words, velar [x] in front ones.
// This is the clearest single audible cue to a word's harmony class.
.group х
        // ь + an iotated vowel: palatalised, but the vowel brings its
        // own /j/ so this must NOT add one. Needs the full harmony ladder
        // because the `(ь` rules below outrank a bare `(ьL08` guard and
        // would otherwise double the glide (өгье -> [ɵkjje]).
        L01L10L10L10) х (ьL08	X
        L01L10L10) х (ьL08	X
        L01L10) х (ьL08	X
        L01) х (ьL08	X
        L02L10L10L10) х (ьL08	x
        L02L10L10) х (ьL08	x
        L02L10) х (ьL08	x
        L02) х (ьL08	x

        // ь palatalises х, and harmony still decides velar vs uvular.
        // These need the harmony context spelled out because .L05 includes
        // ь, so the plain `L01) х (L05 -> X` ladder below was matching х
        // before ь and winning on context length. The effect was that дах
        // and дахь synthesised to byte-identical audio (both t'aX), and the
        // same for нөх/нөхь, баг/багь, ах/ахь -- different words, same sound.
        L01L10L10L10) х (ь     Xj
        L01L10L10) х (ь     Xj
        L01L10) х (ь        Xj
        L01) х (ь           Xj
        L02L10L10L10) х (ь     xj
        L02L10L10) х (ь     xj
        L02L10) х (ь        xj
        L02) х (ь           xj
        х (ь                xj

        х (L01              X
        х (L02              x

        // и is harmonically TRANSPARENT (.L03), so х before и must take the
        // harmony class of the vowel further back, not default to velar.
        // The г group below already does this and says so in a comment; х
        // was left with a bare `х (и -> x`, which gave back-harmony words the
        // front allophone: борхи, тохир, унших and ногоохи all came out with
        // velar [x] where Khalkha has uvular [χ].
        L01L10L10L10) х (и     X
        L01L10L10) х (и     X
        L01L10) х (и        X
        L01) х (и           X
        L02L10L10L10) х (и     x
        L02L10L10) х (и     x
        L02L10) х (и        x
        L02) х (и           x
        х (и                x

        L01L10L10L10) х (_     X
        L01L10L10) х (_     X
        L01L10) х (_        X
        L01) х (_           X
        L02L10L10L10) х (_     x
        L02L10L10) х (_     x
        L02L10) х (_        x
        L02) х (_           x
        L01L10L10L10) х (L05   X
        L01L10L10) х (L05   X
        L01L10) х (L05      X
        L01) х (L05         X
        L02L10L10L10) х (L05   x
        L02L10L10) х (L05   x
        L02L10) х (L05      x
        L02) х (L05         x

        х                   x

.group с
        с (ьL08     s
        с (ь        s;
        с           s

.group ш
        ш           S

.group щ
        щ           S

.group ф
        ф           f

// в is /w/ in native words. Loanwords needing [v] are listed in
// mn_list with an explicit v.
.group в
        в (ьL08     w
        в (ь        w;
        в           w


// -- Nasals -----------------------------------------------------

.group м
        м (ьL08     m
        м (ь        m;
        м           m

// н is [ŋ] before a velar/uvular and word-finally, [n] elsewhere.
// In word-final -ан/-эн/-… the vowel reduces (see G5) and the н is
// reached here as an ordinary word-final consonant, giving [ŋ].
.group н
        н (ьL08     n
        н (ь        n^
        н (г        N
        н (к        N
        н (х        N
        // Word-final н is a PLAIN n. It used to be the velar N [ŋ], which is
        // what the reference describes, but a native speaker chose n on a
        // straight A/B (хүн, ном, сайн, эрдэмтэн). Assimilation before a velar
        // is unaffected -- н (г, н (к, н (х above all keep N.
        н (_        n
        н           n


// -- Liquids ----------------------------------------------------
